Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2444
Listing of applicants and permitholders; availability; confidential information.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall maintain a listing of all applicants and permitholders and any pertinent information regarding such applicants and permitholders. The information shall be available upon request to all federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies. Information relating to an applicant or to a permitholder received or maintained pursuant to the Concealed Handgun Permit Act by the Nebraska State Patrol or any other law enforcement agency is confidential and shall not be considered a public record within the meaning of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 18.